Florida, session 2026, HB6007.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
125.0104, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
125.0104 Tourist development tax; procedure for levying;
authorized uses; referendum; enforcement.—
(5) AUTHORIZED USES OF REVENUE.—
(a) All tax revenues received pursuant to this section by
a county imposing the tourist development tax shall be used by
that county for the following purposes only:
1. To acquire, construct, extend, enlarge, remodel,
repair, improve, maintain, operate, or promote one or more:
a. Publicly owned and operated convention centers, sports
stadiums, sports arenas, coliseums, or auditoriums within the
boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing district in
which the tax is levied;
b. Auditoriums that are publicly owned but are operated by
organizations that are exempt from federal taxation pursuant to
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6007-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6007 2026
26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3) and open to the public, within the
boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing district in
which the tax is levied; or
c. Aquariums or museums that are publicly owned and
operated or owned and operated by not-for-profit organizations
and open to the public, within the boundaries of the county or
subcounty special taxing district in which the tax is levied;
2. To promote zoological parks that are publicly owned and
operated or owned and operated by not-for-profit organizations
and open to the public;
3. To promote and advertise tourism in this state and
nationally and internationally; however, if tax revenues are
expended for an activity, service, venue, or event, the
activity, service, venue, or event must have as one of its main
purposes the attraction of tourists as evidenced by the
promotion of the activity, service, venue, or event to tourists;
4. To fund convention bureaus, tourist bureaus, tourist
information centers, and news bureaus as county agencies or by
contract with the chambers of commerce or similar associations
in the county, which may include any indirect administrative
costs for services performed by the county on behalf of the
promotion agency;
5. To finance beach park facilities, or beach, channel,
estuary, or lagoon improvement, maintenance, renourishment,
restoration, and erosion control, including construction of
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6007-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6007 2026
beach groins and shoreline protection, enhancement, cleanup, or
restoration of inland lakes and rivers to which there is public
access as those uses relate to the physical preservation of the
beach, shoreline, channel, estuary, lagoon, or inland lake or
river. However, any funds identified by a county as the local
matching source for beach renourishment, restoration, or erosion
control projects included in the long-range budget plan of the
state's Beach Management Plan, pursuant to s. 161.091, or funds
contractually obligated by a county in the financial plan for a
federally authorized shore protection project may not be used or
loaned for any other purpose. In counties of fewer than 100,000
population, up to 10 percent of the revenues from the tourist
development tax may be used for beach park facilities;
6. To acquire, construct, extend, enlarge, remodel,
repair, improve, maintain, operate, or finance public facilities
within the boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing
district in which the tax is levied, if the public facilities
are needed to increase tourist-related business activities in
the county or subcounty special district and are recommended by
the county tourist development council created pursuant to
paragraph (4)(e). Tax revenues may be used for any related land
acquisition, land improvement, design and engineering costs, and
all other professional and related costs required to bring the
public facilities into service. As used in this subparagraph,
the term "public facilities" means major capital improvements
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6007-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6007 2026
that have a life expectancy of 5 or more years, including, but
not limited to, transportation, sanitary sewer, solid waste,
drainage, potable water, and pedestrian facilities. Tax revenues
may be used for these purposes only if the following conditions
are satisfied:
a. In the county fiscal year immediately preceding the
fiscal year in which the tax revenues were initially used for
such purposes, at least $10 million in tourist development tax
revenue was received or the county is a fiscally constrained
county, as described in s. 218.67(1), located adjacent to the
Gulf of America or the Atlantic Ocean;
b. The county governing board approves the use for the
proposed public facilities by a vote of at least two-thirds of
its membership;
c. No more than 70 percent of the cost of the proposed
public facilities will be paid for with tourist development tax
revenues, and sources of funding for the remaining cost are
identified and confirmed by the county governing board; and
d. At least 40 percent of all tourist development tax
revenues collected in the county are spent to promote and
advertise tourism as provided by this subsection; and
d.e. An independent professional analysis, performed at
the expense of the county tourist development council,
demonstrates the positive impact of the infrastructure project
100 on tourist-related businesses in the county; or
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6007-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6007 2026
101 7. To employ, train, equip, insure, or otherwise fund the
102 provision of lifeguards certified by the American Red Cross, the
103 Y.M.C.A., or an equivalent nationally recognized aquatic
104 training program, for beaches on the Gulf of America or the
105 Atlantic Ocean.
106
107 Subparagraphs 1. and 2. may be implemented through service
108 contracts and leases with lessees that have sufficient expertise
109 or financial capability to operate such facilities.
110 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6007-00